Utah statutes.
78A-1-102.   Trial courts of record -- Divisions.
The district and juvenile courts shall be divided into eight geographical
divisions:
(1)  First District - Box Elder, Cache, and Rich Counties;
(2)  Second District - Weber, Davis, and Morgan Counties;
(3)  Third District - Salt Lake, Summit, and Tooele Counties;
(4)  Fourth District - Utah, Wasatch, Juab, and Millard Counties;
(5)  Fifth District - Beaver, Iron, and Washington Counties;
(6)  Sixth District - Garfield, Kane, Piute, Sanpete, Sevier, and Wayne
Counties;
(7)  Seventh District - Carbon, Emery, Grand, and San Juan Counties; and
(8)  Eighth District - Daggett, Duchesne, and Uintah Counties.
